src/fst/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON V4bPostBase
+RR:rre^ RRConj  "weight: 4.596944583723264" ;
+Persist:yindi^ PERSISTSConj  "weight: 5.73561499226744" ;
0:0 V4bConj ;

LEXICON V4bConj
+Irr:+ninj^ #  "weight: 4.711939363460562" ; 
+Irr:yi^ #  "weight: 4.711939363460562" ; 
@R.TENSE.NP@+NonPst:@R.TENSE.NP@n^ #  "weight: 2.4315184283770575" ;
@R.TENSE.NP@+Imp:@R.TENSE.NP@0^ #  "weight: 2.6723201402884977" ;
@R.TENSE.P@+PstPerf:@R.TENSE.P@~om^ #  "weight: 2.6188743467322175" ;
@R.TENSE.P@+PstImperf:@R.TENSE.P@ni^ #  "weight: 3.5563347601140856" ;

LEXICON V5aPostBase
+RR:rre^ RRConj  "weight: 4.596944583723264" ;
@R.TENSE.NP@+NonPst:@R.TENSE.NP@ng^ #  "weight: 2.4315184283770575" ;
@R.TENSE.P@+PstPerf:@R.TENSE.P@y^ #  "weight: 2.6188743467322175" ;
@R.TENSE.P@+PstImperf:@R.TENSE.P@ngi^ #  "weight: 3.5563347601140856" ;
+Imp:0^ #  "weight: 2.6723201402884977" ;
+Irr:yinj^ #  "weight: 4.711939363460562" ; 

LEXICON V5bPostBase
+RR:rre^ RRConj  "weight: 4.596944583723264" ;
+Persist:~indi^ PERSISTSConj  "weight: 5.73561499226744" ;
0:0 V5bConj ;

LEXICON V5bConj
@R.TENSE.NP@+NonPst:@R.TENSE.NP@ng^ #  "weight: 2.4315184283770575" ;
@R.TENSE.P@+PstPerf:@R.TENSE.P@~i^ #  "weight: 2.6188743467322175" ;
@R.TENSE.P@+PstImperf:@R.TENSE.P@ngi^ #  "weight: 3.5563347601140856" ;
+Imp:0^ #  "weight: 2.6723201402884977" ;
+Irr:yi^ #  "weight: 4.711939363460562" ; 
+Irr:yinj^ #  "weight: 4.711939363460562" ;

LEXICON V5cPostBase
+RR:rre^ RRConj  "weight: 4.596944583723264" ;
@R.TENSE.NP@+NonPst:@R.TENSE.NP@ng^ #  "weight: 2.4315184283770575" ;
@R.TENSE.P@+PstPerf:@R.TENSE.P@~ey^ #  "weight: 2.6188743467322175" ;
@R.TENSE.P@+PstImperf:@R.TENSE.P@ngi^ #  "weight: 3.5563347601140856" ;
+Imp:0^ #  "weight: 2.6723201402884977" ;
+Irr:yi^ #  "weight: 4.711939363460562" ; 

LEXICON V6aPostBase
+RR:ngerre^ RRConj  "weight: 4.596944583723264" ;
@R.TENSE.NP@+NonPst:@R.TENSE.NP@n^ #  "weight: 2.4315184283770575" ;
@R.TENSE.NP@+NonPst:@R.TENSE.NP@ngen^ #  "weight: 2.4315184283770575" ;
@R.TENSE.P@+PstPerf:@R.TENSE.P@nj^ #  "weight: 2.6188743467322175" ;
@R.TENSE.P@+PstPerf:@R.TENSE.P@nginj^ #  "weight: 2.6188743467322175" ;
@R.TENSE.P@+PstImperf:@R.TENSE.P@nj^ #  "weight: 3.5563347601140856" ;
@R.TENSE.P@+PstImperf:@R.TENSE.P@ngeni^ #  "weight: 3.5563347601140856" ;
+Imp:ngimen^ #  "weight: 2.6723201402884977" ;
+Irr:ngemeninj^ #  "weight: 4.711939363460562" ; 

LEXICON V7aPostBase
@R.TENSE.NP@+NonPst:@R.TENSE.NP@0^ #  "weight: 2.4315184283770575" ;
@R.TENSE.P@+PstPerf:@R.TENSE.P@0^ #  "weight: 2.6188743467322175" ;
@R.TENSE.P@+PstImperf:@R.TENSE.P@0^ #  "weight: 3.5563347601140856" ;
+Imp:n^ #  "weight: 2.6723201402884977" ;
+Irr:wirrinj^ #  "weight: 4.711939363460562" ;

LEXICON V8PostBase  
@R.TENSE.NP@+NonPst:@R.TENSE.NP@0^ #  "weight: 2.4315184283770575" ;
@R.TENSE.NP@+NonPst:@R.TENSE.NP@ngen^ #  "weight: 2.4315184283770575" ;  
@R.TENSE.P@+PstPerf:@R.TENSE.P@y^ #  "weight: 2.6188743467322175" ;
@R.TENSE.P@+PstPerf:@R.TENSE.P@nginj^ #  "weight: 2.6188743467322175" ;
@R.TENSE.P@+PstImperf:@R.TENSE.P@y^ #  "weight: 3.5563347601140856" ;
+Imp:~un^ #  "weight: 2.6723201402884977" ;
+Irr:~uwirrinj^ #  "weight: 4.711939363460562" ; 


LEXICON V9PostBase
@R.TENSE.NP@+NonPst:@R.TENSE.NP@an^ #  "weight: 2.4315184283770575" ;
@R.TENSE.P@+PstPerf:@R.TENSE.P@i^ #  "weight: 2.6188743467322175" ;
@R.TENSE.P@+PstImperf:@R.TENSE.P@anj^ #  "weight: 3.5563347601140856" ;
+Imp:a^ #  "weight: 2.6723201402884977" ;
+Irr:~angemeninj^ #  "weight: 4.711939363460562" ; 

LEXICON V10PostBase
@R.TENSE.NP@+NonPst:@R.TENSE.NP@n^ #  "weight: 2.4315184283770575" ;
@R.TENSE.P@+PstPerf:@R.TENSE.P@~inj^ #  "weight: 2.6188743467322175" ;
@R.TENSE.P@+PstImperf:@R.TENSE.P@ni^ #  "weight: 3.5563347601140856" ;
+Imp:men^ #  "weight: 2.6723201402884977" ;
+Irr:=imeninj^ #  "weight: 4.711939363460562" ;
+Irr:~imeninj^ #  "weight: 4.711939363460562" ;


LEXICON V11PostBase
@R.TENSE.NP@+NonPst:@R.TENSE.NP@men^ #  "weight: 2.4315184283770575" ;
@R.TENSE.P@+PstPerf:@R.TENSE.P@minj^ #  "weight: 2.6188743467322175" ;
@R.TENSE.P@+PstImperf:@R.TENSE.P@meni^ #  "weight: 3.5563347601140856" ;
+Imp:mimen^ #  "weight: 2.6723201402884977" ;
+Irr:meninj^ #  "weight: 4.711939363460562" ;
+RR:merre^ RRConj  "weight: 4.596944583723264" ;
+Persist:yindi^ PERSISTSConj  "weight: 5.73561499226744" ;

LEXICON ReVerbs
@R.TENSE.NP@re+NonPst:@R.TENSE.NP@(r)e^ #  "weight: 2.4315184283770575" ;                            ! go
@R.TENSE.P@re+PstPerf:@R.TENSE.P@wam^ #  "weight: 2.6188743467322175" ;
@R.TENSE.P@re+PstImperf:@R.TENSE.P@(r)ey^ #  "weight: 3.5563347601140856" ;
re+Imp:(r)ay^ #  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;
re+Irr:(r)ayinj^ #  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;

LEXICON NonverbalPostBase
@R.TENSE.NP@+NonPst:@R.TENSE.NP@0^ #  "weight: 2.4315184283770575" ;
@R.TENSE.P@+PstPerf:@R.TENSE.P@minj^ #  "weight: 2.6188743467322175" ;
@R.TENSE.P@+PstImperf:@R.TENSE.P@ni^ #  "weight: 3.5563347601140856" ;
+Imp:nin^ #  "weight: 2.6723201402884977" ;
+Irr:niwirrinj^ #  "weight: 4.711939363460562" ;

LEXICON IrregularVerbsIntr
@R.TENSE.NP@bengmid+NonPst:@R.TENSE.NP@bengmiddan^ #  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;                ! forget
@R.TENSE.P@bengmid+PstPerf:@R.TENSE.P@bengmiddanj^ #  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;
@R.TENSE.P@bengmid+PstImperf:@R.TENSE.P@bengmiddangeni^ #  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;
bengmid+Imp:bengmiddangimen^ #  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;
bengmid+Irr:bengmiddangemeninj^ #  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;

@R.TENSE.NP@bore+NonPst:@R.TENSE.NP@bore^ #  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;                          ! flow (water)
@R.TENSE.P@bore+PstPerf:@R.TENSE.P@bowam^ #  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;
@R.TENSE.P@bore+PstImperf:@R.TENSE.P@borey^ #  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;
bore+Imp:boray^ #  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;
bore+Irr:borayinj^ #  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;

@R.TENSE.NP@dungre+NonPst:@R.TENSE.NP@dungre^ #  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;                     ! movement of the sun
@R.TENSE.P@dungre+PstPerf:@R.TENSE.P@dungwam^ #  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;
@R.TENSE.P@dungre+PstImperf:@R.TENSE.P@dungrey^ #  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;
dungre+Imp:dungray^ #  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;
dungre+Irr:dungrayinj^ #  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;

@R.TENSE.NP@kakre+NonPst:@R.TENSE.NP@kakre^ #  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;                       ! travel at night
@R.TENSE.P@kakre+PstPerf:@R.TENSE.P@kakwam^ #  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;
@R.TENSE.P@kakre+PstImperf:@R.TENSE.P@kakrey^ #  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;
kakre+Imp:kakray^ #  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;
kakre+Irr:kakrayinj^ #  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;

@R.TENSE.NP@kurlbare+NonPst:@R.TENSE.NP@kurlbare^ #  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;                  ! travel at night
@R.TENSE.P@kurlbare+PstPerf:@R.TENSE.P@kurlbawam^ #  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;
@R.TENSE.P@kurlbare+PstImperf:@R.TENSE.P@kurlbarey^ #  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;
kurlbare+Imp:kurlbaray^ #  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;
kurlbare+Irr:kurlbarayinj^ #  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;

@R.TENSE.NP@wohre+NonPst:@R.TENSE.NP@wohre^ #  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;                        ! wander, walk around
@R.TENSE.P@wohre+PstPerf:@R.TENSE.P@wohwam^ #  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;
@R.TENSE.P@wohre+PstImperf:@R.TENSE.P@wohrey^ #  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;
wohre+Imp:wohray^ #  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;
wohre+Irr:wohrayinj^ #  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;

LEXICON IrregularVerbsTrns
@R.TENSE.NP@mulewan+NonPst:@R.TENSE.NP@mulewan^ #  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;                    ! inform
@R.TENSE.P@mulewan+PstPerf:@R.TENSE.P@mulewam^ #  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;
@R.TENSE.P@mulewan+PstImperf:@R.TENSE.P@mulewani^ #  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;

LEXICON RRConj
@R.TENSE.NP@+NonPst:@R.TENSE.NP@n^ #  "weight: 2.4315184283770575" ;
@R.TENSE.P@+PstPerf:@R.TENSE.P@~inj^ #  "weight: 2.6188743467322175" ;
@R.TENSE.P@+PstImperf:@R.TENSE.P@ni^ #  "weight: 3.5563347601140856" ;
+Imp:~emen^ #  "weight: 2.6723201402884977" ;
+Irr:~imeninj^ #  "weight: 4.711939363460562" ;
