src/fst/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON IntransitiveVerbs
0:0 IrregularVerbsIntr ;                                ! there are a couple irregular intransitive^ Verbs to treat explicitly 
barlid:barlid^ V9PostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;
bo:bo^ ReVerbs "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;                                             ! flow 
da:da^ V6aPostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;                                           ! stand, come live in a place
dangwerre:dangwerre^ V10PostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;                             ! argue with each other
di:di^ V7aPostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;                                           ! be, be standing
djabd:djabd^ V9PostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;
djabda:djabda^ V6aPostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;                                    ! stick up
djalre:djal^ ReVerbs "weight: 12.952324478976898" ; 
djangdi:djangdi^ V7aPostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;
dowerre:dowerre^ V10PostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;
dungbang:dungbang^ V11PostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;
durnde:rdurnde^ V5bPostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;                                   ! return, go back (alternate pelling)
kakre:kak^ ReVerbs "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;                                    ! travel at night
karu:karu^ V5aPostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;                                      ! dig (intr)
kerlk:kerlk^ V11PostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;
keyo:keyo^ V8PostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;                                  ! lie down
kongibu:kongibu^ V4bPostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;                          ! feel compassion
kunidi:kunidi^ V7aPostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;
kurre:kurre^ V10PostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;                              ! decieve, trick
ngeydi:ngeydi^ V7aPostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;
ngudjwarre:ngudjwarre^ V11PostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;
ngukde:ngukde^ V5bPostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;                                    ! defecate
0:0^ ReVerbs "weight: 12.952324478976898" ; 
rra:rra^ V6aPostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;                                       ! stand, come live in a place
wareyo:wareyo^ V8PostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;
wolebukkiyo:wolebukkiyo^ V8PostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;
worrk:worrk^ V11PostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;                                     ! be full of food
yikadjurre:yikadjurre^ V10PostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;
yo:yo^ V8PostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;                                         ! lie
yongen:yo^ V6aPostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;
LEXICON TransitiveVerbs
0:0 IrregularVerbsTrns ;                ! there are a couple irregular transitive verbs to treat explicitly 
babbulibu:babbulibu V4bPostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;
babma:babma V5cPostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;
borndu:borndu^ V5aPostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;
borrkbu:borrkbu^ V4bPostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;
djalkma:djalkma^ V5cPostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;
djare:djare NonverbalPostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;                                      ! want
djarrangbu:djarrangbu^ V4bPostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;                                ! sort
djumdo:djumdo^ V5aPostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;
durndiwe:durndiwe^ V5bPostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;                   ! cause to return, go back
karu:karu^ V5aPostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;                      ! dig
lowkma:lowkma^ V5cPostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;
marnedjare:marnedjare NonverbalPostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;                                 ! love, desire
ngeybu:ngeybu^ V4bPostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;
ngorrma:ngorrma^ V5cPostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;
ngudjkadju:ngudjkadju^ V5aPostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;
rrurndiwe:rrurndiwe^ V5bPostBase  "weight: 12.952324478976898" ;                 ! cause to return, go back
